Washington statutes.
RCW 18.64.580

Long-term care pharmacies—Ratio of pharmacists to pharmacy technicians—Standards.

The commission must adopt reasonable, task-based standards regarding the ratio of pharmacists to pharmacy technicians in a closed door long-term care pharmacy. For the purpose of such standards, a pharmacy technician licensed under chapter 18.64A RCW may not be considered to be practicing as a pharmacy technician while performing administrative tasks not associated with immediate dispensing of drugs that may lawfully be performed by a registered pharmacy assistant. Administrative tasks not associated with immediate dispensing of drugs include but are not necessarily limited to medical records maintenance, billing, prepackaging unit dose drugs, inventory control, delivery, and processing returned drugs.

[ 2016 c 148 s 5.]